SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çăнăх/A
çарма/A
çурăк/A
çырулăх/A
ăмăртлану/A
ăнкарулăх/A
ăрăс/A
ăса/A
ăссăрлану/A
ăшсăр/A
Агафонович/A
Айрес/A
Аксён/A
Алик/A
Алюкка/A
Антверпен/A
Апраç/A
Арктур/A
Архипович/A
Ахмат/A
Балтимор/A
Беловеж/A
Биробиджан/A
Брайтон/A
Ваçуш/A
Ваньтюк/A
Велла/A
Виктор/A
Владивосток/A
Воронеж/A
Галактион/A
Генрих/A
Глеб/A
Гудзон/A
Даллас/A
Детройт/A
Дмитров/A
Евгеньевич/A
Емельянович/A
Етриван/A
Загорск/A
Зиновий/A
Измаил/A
Илтюк/A
Ильтукан/A
Ипполит/A
Исенмăрса/A
Ишут/A
Кăчак/A
Казбек/A
Канопус/A
Касампай/A
Кельвин/A
Клапейрон/A
Константинович/A
Красноярск/A
Купрат/A
Лаос/A
Леопольд/A
Лукка/A
Мăрсапай/A
Мадисон/A
Манчестер/A
Матвеевич/A
Мемфис/A
Милан/A
Минтупай/A
Митрофан/A
Могилёв/A
Мулантай/A
Наçа/A
Неман/A
Никанор/A
Новочеркасск/A
Нямаç/A
Орегон/A
Пăрака/A
Паймола/A
Пайусман/A
Патак/A
Первоуральск/A
Пиккуç/A
Пинерук/A
Питриван/A
Плесецк/A
Прокофьевич/A
Расыйа/A
Родион/A
Рыбинск/A
Савка/A
Салехард/A
Сарă/A
Сахва/A
Светогорск/A
Сентрах/A
Сертюк/A
Сидор/A
Симук/A
Ситьрук/A
Спас/A
Стоян/A
Тăхтиман/A
Танжер/A
Терентьев/A
Тимукка/A
Тохтюкка/A
Туйтул/A
Туркестан/A
Уçакка/A
Ультиван/A
Уралмаш/A
Утьнюхха/A
Федосеевич/A
Форос/A
Хаççук/A
Херхерук/A
Хураç/A
Чернов/A
Шахтинск/A
Шехрустан/A
Эйнштейн/A
Элюш/A
Эрнест/A
Юльевич/A
Якут/A
Яраслав/A
Яхап/A
абзац/A
авăнлăх/A
август/A
авиатранспорт/A
автоçул/A
автомат/A
авторитет/A
агитатор/A
агротехник/A
азимут/A
айкату/A
академик/A
аккордеон/A
акциз/A
алебастр/A
алса/A
альбинизм/A
ама/A
амплуа/A
анапест/A
анкер/A
антăрлăх/A
антисоветчик/A
апа/A
апофеоз/A
апшур/A
аргумент/A
аркуç/A
арта/A
архиерей/A
асăрханусăрлăх/A
асбест/A
ассонанс/A
атавизм/A
атомсăр/A
африкан/A
ачалăх/A
аэродром/A
бай/A
балласт/A
бантик/A
бас/A
бегемот/A
бенуар/A
бизнесмен/A
бицепс/A
болельщик/A
бот/A
браунинг/A
броня/A
булочнăй/A
бурт/A
вăй/A
вăрă/A
вăрмар/A
вайсăрлăх/A
вальс/A
варкаш/AHE
ватрас/A
венгр/A
ветврач/A
видеоматериал/A
витамин/A
вокалист/A
всеобуч/A
вырăн/A
гарнизон/A
генштаб/A
гидросамолёт/A
гопак/A
графин/A
дальномер/A
декоратор/A
дефицит/A
диктаторлăх/A
доброволец/A
доха/A
ефрейтор/A
задаток/A
захватчик/A
ибис/A
икс/A
индикатор/A
интернационалист/A
йăк/A
йăпану/A
йăшаланчăк/AE
кăйăк/A
кăмăшка/A
кăсăклăх/A
кĕрлĕх/A
каганат/A
калăпсăр/A
кальсон/A
кант/A
каплану/A
караим/A
карланкă/A
карьер/A
катализатор/A
качмак/A
кегельбан/A
киноаппарат/A
клапан/A
код/A
колхозник/A
компаньон/A
конкретлăх/A
контрреволюционер/A
корнет/A
кофеин/A
кретин/A
кубик/A
кулуçах/A
купăста/A
курмăш/A
кутăр/A
лăсă/A
лам/A
лапрашка/A
лаша/A
лесхоз/A
листа/A
локомотив/A
люк/A
мăкламас/A
мăшкăлçă/A
майлашусăрлăх/A
малашлăх/A
марабу/A
масла/A
мачча/A
менеджер/A
метрополитен/A
минарет/A
молибден/A
мотовелосипед/A
муляж/A
муштук/A
налив/A
натурщик/A
неофашизм/A
нурăс/A
огнемёт/A
оппортунист/A
осетр/A
пăлахай/A
пăрачкав/A
пăхăрçă/A
пайăрка/A
палисандр/A
пантаккай/A
параноик/A
партер/A
патефон/A
пацифист/A
перламутр/A
пилотсăр/A
планктон/A
пляж/A
пойнтер/A
поляр/A
поток/A
пресс/A
пристав/A
проектировщик/A
противогаз/A
пуçкасан/A
пуловер/A
пуритан/A
путавçă/A
пылаклăх/A
радиозонд/A
раймаг/A
рафинад/A
революционер/A
рейсфедер/A
репродуктор/A
розмарин/A
рюкзак/A
сăн/A
сăрттай/A
сад/A
салмалăх/A
санинструктор/A
сарăплăх/A
сафьян/A
сейнер/A
сепаратор/A
симптом/A
скиф/A
сменщик/A
соратник/A
спиннинг/A
станочник/A
стимул/A
струг/A
сулăмлăх/A
супах/A
сухалей/A
сыра/A
тăванкас/A
тăм/A
тăплăм/A
тăртанчăк/A
табу/A
такелаж/A
тальянккă/A
тапир/A
татăçу/A
телеоператор/A
тестер/A
том/A
трактор/A
трикотаж/A
туйăмсăрлăх/A
тунец/A
туптавçă/A
турта/A
тухакан/AE
тюбик/A
угрозыск/A
укрук/A
умывальник/A
урасăр/A
услап/A
ухута/A
факультет/A
федералист/A
философ/A
фольклорист/A
фотомонтаж/A
фуражир/A
хăлăпсăр/A
хăпарту/A
хăтланчăк/A
хавтан/A
халсăр/A
харсăрлăх/A
ходок/A
художествăлăх/A
хупăнчăк/A
хурланчăк/A
хушăм/A
хырăмсалăх/A
централизм/A
чăкраш/A
чăрману/A
чалам/A
чат/A
чунавальник/A
шăйрăк/A
шăнкал/A
шăтăк/AE
шалаш/A
шапульник/A
шахвăрту/A
шифр/A
шпалёр/A
штрих/A
шурф/A
ывăç/A
ытарлăх/A
экспансионизм/A
электрокар/A
энциклопедизм/A
этикет/A
юмор/A
юрай/A
юшкăн/A
янăравсăр/A
ясар/AE
